Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
LOANS

§412:10-400 Applicability of part.
This part sets forth the requirements and restrictions for lending by all
credit unions. A credit union may make loans and extensions of credit as
permitted by this part and as provided elsewhere in this article. [L 1993, c
350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next